Hawaii statutes.
§454F-12 Enforcement authorities;
violations; penalties. (a) To ensure the effective supervision and
enforcement of this chapter, the commissioner may, pursuant to chapter 91:

(1) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to
renew a license because of a violation of this chapter, rules, an order, or a
directive entered under this chapter;

(2) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to
renew a license if an applicant or licensee fails at any time to meet the
requirements of section 454F-4, 454F-6, or 454F-8, violates section 454F-17, or
withholds information or makes a material misstatement in an application for a
license or renewal of a license;

(3) Order restitution against persons subject to this
chapter for violations of this chapter;

(4) Impose fines on persons subject to this chapter;
and

(5) Issue orders or directives under this chapter as
follows:

(A) Order or direct persons subject to this
chapter to cease and desist from conducting business, including immediate
temporary orders to cease and desist;

(B) Order or direct persons subject to this
chapter to cease any harmful activities or violations of this chapter,
including immediate temporary orders to cease and desist;

(C) Enter immediate temporary orders to cease
doing business under a license issued pursuant to the authority granted under
this chapter if the commissioner determines that the license was erroneously
granted or the licensee or any person subject to this chapter is currently in
violation of this chapter; or

(D) Order or direct any other affirmative
action as the commissioner deems necessary.

(b) The commissioner may impose an
administrative fine on a licensee or person subject to this chapter if the
commissioner finds on the record after notice and opportunity for hearing that
the licensee or person subject to this chapter has violated or failed to comply
with any requirement of this chapter or any rule prescribed by the commissioner
under this chapter or order issued under the authority of this chapter.

(c) The maximum fine for each act or omission
described in subsection (b) shall be $25,000.

(d) Each violation or failure to comply with
any directive or order of the commissioner shall be a separate and distinct
violation.

(e) Notwithstanding section 480-13.5, any
violation of this chapter that is directed toward, targets, or injures an
elder, may be subject to an additional civil penalty not in excess of $10,000
for each violation in addition to any other fines or penalties assessed for the
violation. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §19; am L 2014, c 198, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next